North Dakota, session 69, SB2020.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the North
Dakota state university extension service, the northern crops institute, the upper great plains
transportation institute, the main research center, branch research centers, and agronomy seed farm for
the purpose of defraying the expenses of the North Dakota state university extension service, the
northern crops institute, the upper great plains transportation institute, the main research center, branch
research centers, and agronomy seed farm, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027, as follows:
Subdivision 1.
NORTH DAKOTA STATE UNIVERSITY EXTENSION SERVICE
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Extension service $59,478,945 $2,342,700 $61,821,645
Soil conservation committee 1,361,520 0 1,361,520
New and vacant FTE pool 0 3,301,295 3,301,295
Total all funds $60,840,465 $5,643,995 $66,484,460
Less other funds 29,049,776 2,839,356 31,889,132
Total general fund $31,790,689 $2,804,639 $34,595,328
Full-time equivalent positions 252.70 3.74 256.44
Subdivision 2.
NORTHERN CROPS INSTITUTE
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Northern crops institute $5,724,771 $1,549,397 $7,274,168
New and vacant FTE pool 0 101,995 101,995
Total all funds $5,724,771 $1,651,392 $7,376,163
Less other funds 3,541,116 852,928 4,394,044
Total general fund $2,183,655 $798,464 $2,982,119
Full-time equivalent positions 18.15 0.20 18.35
Subdivision 3.
UPPER GREAT PLAINS TRANSPORTATION INSTITUTE
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Upper great plains transportation $24,807,516 $521,955 $25,329,471

S. B. NO. 2020 - PAGE 2
institute
New and vacant FTE pool 0 266,019 266,019
Total all funds $24,807,516 $787,974 $25,595,490
Less other funds 19,581,141 507,090 20,088,231
Total general fund $5,226,375 $280,884 $5,507,259
Full-time equivalent positions 43.88 (1.00) 42.88
Subdivision 4.
MAIN RESEARCH CENTER
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Main research center $116,148,130 $19,566,700 $135,714,830
New and vacant FTE pool 0 5,060,201 5,060,201
Total all funds $116,148,130 $24,626,901 $140,775,031
Less other funds 58,022,465 19,051,827 77,074,292
Total general fund $58,125,665 $5,575,074 $63,700,739
Full-time equivalent positions 358.47 6.08 364.55
Subdivision 5.
BRANCH RESEARCH CENTERS
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Dickinson research center $7,379,838 $435,827 $7,815,665
Central grasslands research center 3,618,270 168,766 3,787,036
Hettinger research center 5,381,248 240,658 5,621,906
Langdon research center 3,195,869 360,058 3,555,927
North Central research center 5,355,217 202,311 5,557,528
Williston research center 5,527,125 266,785 5,793,910
Carrington research center 10,191,002 408,102 10,599,104
New and vacant FTE pool 0 1,089,674 1,089,674
Total all funds $40,648,569 $3,172,181 $43,820,750
Less other funds 20,964,971 885,212 21,850,183
Total general fund $19,683,598 $2,286,969 $21,970,567
Full-time equivalent positions 111.81 (4.65) 107.16
Subdivision 6.
AGRONOMY SEED FARM
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Agronomy seed farm $1,632,722 $39,931 $1,672,653
New and vacant FTE pool 0 7,343 7,343
Total special funds $1,632,722 $47,274 $1,679,996
Full-time equivalent positions 3.00 0.00 3.00
Subdivision 7.
SECTION 1 TOTAL
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Grand total all funds $249,802,173 $35,929,717 $285,731,890
Less grand total other funds 132,792,191 24,183,687 156,975,878

S. B. NO. 2020 - PAGE 3
Grand total general fund $117,009,982 $11,746,030 $128,756,012
Full-time equivalent positions 788.01 4.37 792.38
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which each entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth
legislative assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Northern crops institute
Protein extraction and air classification system $0 $350,000 $350,000
Total northern crops institute $0 $350,000 $350,000
Main research center
Equipment storage sheds $1,567,500 $0 $1,567,500
Oakes irrigation research site interior 0 620,000 620,000
Langdon seed conditioning plant 0 2,600,000 2,600,000
Nesson Valley irrigation research site 0 2,300,000 2,300,000
Deferred maintenance 0 500,000 500,000
Williston research center storage shed 0 200,000 200,000
Swine facility renovation 0 6,000,000 6,000,000
Main research center greenhouse addition 0 3,250,000 3,250,000
Total main research center $1,567,500 $15,470,000 $17,037,500
Grand total $1,567,500 $15,820,000 $17,387,500
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The North
Dakota state university extension service, northern crops institute, upper great plains transportation
institute, main research center, branch research centers, and agronomy seed farm may not spend
funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in section 1 of this Act, but may request
the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the new and vacant FTE pool line item to
the North Dakota state university extension service, northern crops institute, upper great plains
transportation institute, main research center, branch research centers, and agronomy seed farm line
items in accordance with the guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as
approved by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. DICKINSON RESEARCH EXTENSION CENTER - MINERAL RIGHTS INCOME. The
Dickinson research extension center may spend up to $755,000 of revenues received during the
2025-27 biennium from mineral royalties, leases, or easements for ongoing operational expenses. Any
revenues received in excess of $755,000 may be spent only for one-time expenditures, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. WILLISTON RESEARCH EXTENSION CENTER - MINERAL RIGHTS INCOME -
REPORT. The Williston research extension center shall report to the seventieth legislative assembly on
amounts received and spent from mineral royalties, leases, or easements in the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, and ending June 30, 2025, and the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30,
2027.
SECTION 6. ADDITIONAL INCOME - APPROPRIATION. In addition to the amounts included in
the other funds appropriation line items and special funds appropriations line item in section 1 of this
Act, any other income, including funds from federal acts, private grants, gifts, and donations, or from
other sources received by the North Dakota state university extension service, the northern crops
institute, the upper great plains transportation institute, the main research center, branch research
centers, and agronomy seed farm, except as otherwise provided by law, is appropriated for the purpose
designated in the act, grant, gift, or donation, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2020 - PAGE 4
SECTION 7. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND - MAIN
RESEARCH CENTER. The other funds line item in subdivision 4 of section 1 of the Act includes the
sum of $2,470,000 from the strategic investment and improvements fund, of which $950,000 is for the
Langdon seed conditioning plant, $620,000 is for the Oakes irrigation research site, $500,000 is for
deferred maintenance, and $400,000 is for the Nesson Valley irrigation research site.
SECTION 8. EXEMPTION - TRANSFER AUTHORITY. Notwithstanding section 54-16-04, upon
approval of the state board of agricultural research and education and appropriate branch research
center directors, the director of the office of management and budget shall transfer appropriation
authority, except appropriation authority in the new and vacant FTE pool line items, within
subdivisions 1, 2, 4, and 5 of section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 9. EXEMPTION - FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT POSITION ADJUSTMENTS - REPORT.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the state board of higher education may adjust or increase
full-time equivalent positions as needed for the entities in section 1 of this Act, subject to availability of
funds. All full-time or part-time positions must be separate from North Dakota state university. Annually,
the board shall report to the office of management and budget and to the budget section any
adjustments made pursuant to this section.
SECTION 10. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED GENERAL FUND - EXCESS INCOME. Any
unexpended general fund appropriation authority available to and any excess income received by
entities listed in section 1 of this Act are not subject to the provisions of section 54-44.1-11, and any
unexpended funds from these appropriations or revenues are available and may be expended by those
entities, during the biennium beginning July 1, 2027, and ending June 30, 2029.
SECTION 11. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS. The following appropriations are
not subject to the provisions of section 54-44.1-11 and may be continued into the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027:
1. The sum of $475,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund for
storage sheds in subdivision 4 of section 1 of chapter 20 of the 2023 Session Laws; and
2. The sum of $1,700,000 appropriated from the general fund for the Nesson Valley irrigation
research site project in subdivision 4 of section 1 of chapter 20 of the 2023 Session Laws.
SECTION 12. EXEMPTION - MAIN RESEARCH CENTER - PUBLIC IMPROVEMENT
CONSTRUCTION. The main research center, for its use of the $1,567,500 appropriated from the
general fund for branch research center storage sheds is not subject to the provisions of section
48-01.2-02.1, and the main research center may spend this funding without procuring plans, drawings,
and specifications from an architect or engineer.
SECTION 13. EMERGENCY. The $6,000,000 appropriated from other funds for the swine facility
renovation in subdivision 4 of section 1 of this Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2020 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2020 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 70 Nays 18 Absent 6
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State